District of Columbia statutes.
31-1306

Continuation of delinquency proceedings.

Every proceeding commenced under §§ 31-2502.05 through 31-2502.07 [repealed], and §§ 31-4319 through 31-4321 [repealed], shall be deemed to have commenced under this chapter for the purpose of continuing the proceeding, except that in the discretion of the Commissioner the proceeding may be continued, in whole or in part, as it would have been continued had this chapter not been enacted.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 7, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-2806.

“ Sections 31-2502.05 through 31-2502.07”, referred to in this section, were repealed by D.C. Law 10-35, § 59(b), 40 DCR 5773, effective October 15, 1993.

“ Sections 31-4319 through 31-4321”, referred to in this section, were repealed by D.C. Law 10-35, § 59(a), 40 DCR 5773, effective October 15, 1993.